test/src/gt-norm-yamls/to_be_checked/V-lex-der-oppad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - oppâđ: # not checked


    oppâđ+V+Inf: oppâđ
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: ooppuđ
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ooppuum
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ooppuuh
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáppoo
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáppojeen
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ooppuuvettee
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ooppuv
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ooppup
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ooppuuvetteđ
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáppojeh
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáppojim
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uáppojih
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ooppui
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ooppuim
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ooppuid
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ooppuin
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ooppuim
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ooppuid
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáppojii
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ooppuuččim
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ooppuuččih
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ooppuuččij
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ooppuuččáim
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ooppuuččáid
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ooppuuččáin
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ooppuuččijm
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ooppuuččijd
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ooppuuččii
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ooppuužeem
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ooppuužeeh
#    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: uápuš
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: ooppuužeen
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: uápušvettee
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: ooppuužává
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: ooppuužep
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: uápušvetteđ
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ooppuužeh
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ooppuu
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ooppum
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: uápuuččii
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ooppuužii
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: uáppuee
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: ooppum
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: ooppum
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: ooppuumin
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: ooppuumist
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: ooppuumân
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: ooppuudijn
    oppâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: ooppuuhánnáá
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uápâdâm
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uápâdah
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uápâd
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uápâdeen
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uápâdvettee
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uápâdává
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uápâdeh
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uápâd
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uápâdim
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uápâdij
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uápâdii
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: uápâdiččim
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: uápâdičij
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uápâdižžeem
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: uápâdiš
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uápâd
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uápâdâm
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: uápâdižžii
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: uápâdâm
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: uápâdhennáá
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: uápâdhinnáá
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: uápâdhánnáá
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: uápâdem
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: uápâdmân
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: uápâdmin
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: uápâdmist
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: uápâddijn
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: uápâddijnân
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: uápâddijnâd
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: uápâddijnis
    oppâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: uápâdtijn
    oppâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uápâstâm
    oppâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uápâttâm
    oppâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: opâškuáđám
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: opâlâm
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáppâl
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: opâleen
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: opâleh
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáppâl
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: opâlim
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: opâlij
    oppâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: opâlii
